Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Chapter 113. Feeding Prohibited Food Waste to Swine

§ 1671.
Definition.

As used in this chapter, “prohibited food waste” means the following:

pre- and postconsumer waste material derived in whole or in part from the meat of any animal, including fish and poultry, or from other animal material; or

material that, as a result of the handling, preparation, cooking, disposal, or consumption of food, has come into contact with pre- or postconsumer waste material derived in whole or in part from the meat of any animal, including fish or poultry, or from other animal material.

The term “prohibited food waste” shall not include the following:

waste from ordinary household operations that is fed directly to swine raised exclusively for the use in the household of the owner of the swine by members of the household and nonpaying guests and employees; and

processed dairy products.

HISTORY:

Amended

2003, No. 37

, § 4;

2017, No. 30

, § 5.

§ 1672.
Feeding of prohibited food waste.

No person shall feed prohibited food waste to swine or supply prohibited food waste to others for the purpose of feeding it to swine.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

2003, No. 37

, § 4.

§§ 1673,
1674.
Repealed. 2003, No. 37, § 4.

§ 1675.
Inspection and investigation; records.

Any authorized representative of the Vermont Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets or U.S. Department of Agriculture is authorized to enter at reasonable times upon any private or public property for the purpose of inspecting and investigating the allegations of feeding of prohibited food waste to swine.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

2003, No. 37

, § 4;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2017, No. 30

, § 5.

§ 1676.
Regulations; cooperation with United States.

The Agency is charged with administration and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, and is authorized to adopt rules and enforce all State and federal laws, rules, and regulations that it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The Agency is authorized to cooperate with the U.S. Department of Agriculture.

HISTORY:

Amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2017, No. 30

, § 5.

§ 1677.
Penalties.

A person who violates any of the provisions of or who fails to perform any duty imposed by this chapter or who violates any rule adopted under this chapter shall be assessed an administrative penalty under section 15 of this title. Each day upon which such violation occurs constitutes a separate offense. In addition thereto, the person may be enjoined from further violation.

HISTORY:

Amended

2003, No. 37

, § 4;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2017, No. 30

, § 5;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 25.